Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.030

Duties of president.

It shall be the duty of the president to preside at all meetings of the board, and to perform such other duties as the board may prescribe.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.050. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 290 s 5; RRS s 4794. Formerly RCW 28A.59.050, 28.62.050.]